District of Columbia statutes.
21-2053

Notice.

(a)

On a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order, the requirements for notice described in section 21-2042 apply, but if the individual to be protected has disappeared, has been detained by a foreign power, or is being held hostage by someone other than a foreign power, notice to the individual must be given by publication as provided in section 21-2031(b)(3).

(b)

Notice of a hearing on a petition for an order subsequent to appointment of a conservator or other protective order shall be given to the protected individual, any conservator of the protected individual’s estate, and any other person as ordered by the court.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-305 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).
1981 Ed., § 21-2053.